Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,125
Income, surplus, and payments; use.

All income, surplus, and payments received by a local housing agency, or to which such agency shall become entitled, shall be used for carrying out the purposes of the Nebraska Housing Agency Act.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 54.